Washington statutes.
RCW 35.30.070

Adoption of powers granted to code cities—Resolution required.

If the legislative body of an unclassified city determines that it would serve the best interests and general welfare of such municipality, the body may by resolution adopt any powers granted to cities classified under Title 35A RCW including, but not limited to, the power to define the functions, powers, and duties of its officers and employees.

[ 2003 c 42 s 1.]